Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-4,147
Receipts from excise tax; disposition.

The receipts from the tax established under sections 66-4,145, 66-4,146, and 66-6,109 shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund. Credits and refunds of such tax allowed to producers, suppliers, distributors, wholesalers, exporters, importers, or retailers shall be paid from the Highway Trust Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and refunds, shall be allocated to the Highway Allocation Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 722, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 258, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-479;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 60;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 80;

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 37;

Laws 2000, LB 1067, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 31.